New York, session 2025-2026, S5387.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 2 commissioner of transportation shall waive the annual security deposit 3 fee specified in Use and Occupancy Permit No. 82771 issued to the 4 Bedford Hills Fire District, Town of Bedford, Westchester County allow- 5 ing for the use of approximately 4,000 square feet of state land located 6 adjacent to 325 Bedford Road for the purpose of providing exclusive 7 parking for volunteer firefighter members of the Bedford Hills Fire 8 District. The provisions of this act shall not affect or impair any 9 other provision of said Use and Occupancy Permit. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10093-01-5